Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2502
Laws not applicable.

The following laws and regulations of this state shall not apply to any ride-sharing arrangement using a motor vehicle with a seating capacity for not more than fifteen persons, including the driver:

(1) Chapter 75, pertaining to the regulation of motor carriers of any kind or description by the Public Service Commission;

(2) Laws and regulations containing insurance requirements that are specifically applicable to motor carriers or commercial motor vehicles;

(3) Laws and regulations with equipment requirements and special accident reporting requirements that are specifically applicable to motor carriers or commercial motor vehicles; and

(4) Laws imposing a tax on fuel purchased in another state by a motor carrier.

Laws 1981, LB 50, § 2.